Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE B. DRIVER'S LICENSES AND PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION CARDS

CHAPTER 523. DRIVER'S LICENSE COMPACT OF 1993

Sec. 523.001. ENACTMENT. The Driver's License Compact of 1993 is enacted and entered into.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.002. FINDINGS AND DECLARATION OF POLICY. (a) The states find that:

(1) the safety of their streets and highways is materially affected by the degree of compliance with state laws and local ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles;

(2) violation of such a law or ordinance is evidence that the violator engages in conduct which is likely to endanger the safety of persons and property; and

(3) the continuance in force of a license to drive is predicated on compliance with laws and ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles in whichever jurisdiction the vehicle is operated.

(b) It is the policy of each of the states to:

(1) promote compliance with the laws, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations relating to the operation of motor vehicles by their operators in each of the jurisdictions where the operators drive motor vehicles; and

(2) make the reciprocal recognition of licenses to drive and eligibility therefor more just and equitable by considering the overall compliance with motor vehicle laws, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations as a condition precedent to the continuance or issuance of any license by reason of which the licensee is authorized or permitted to operate a motor vehicle in any of the states.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.003. DEFINITIONS. In this compact:

(1) "Conviction" has the same meaning as provided in Section 522.003.

(2) "Executive director" means the director of the Department of Public Safety or the equivalent officer of another state.

(3) "Home state" means the state which has issued a license or permit and has the power to suspend or revoke use of the license or permit to operate a motor vehicle.

(4) "License" means a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued by a state.

(5) "Licensing authority" means the Department of Public Safety or the equivalent agency of another state.

(6) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(7) "Violation" means the commission of an offense related to the use or operation of a motor vehicle, even if there has been no conviction. A suspension by reason of a violation includes a suspension for failure to appear in court or comply with a court order or suspension for violating an implied consent law.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.004. REPORTS OF CONVICTIONS. The licensing authority of a state shall report each conviction of a person from another state occurring within its jurisdiction to the licensing authority of the home state of the licensee. Such report shall clearly identify the person convicted; describe the violation specifying the section of the statute, code, or ordinance violated; identify the court in which action was taken; indicate whether a plea of guilty or not guilty was entered or the conviction was a result of the forfeiture of bail, bond, or other security; and include any special findings made in connection with the conviction. A conviction or judicial or administrative action of a federal or military court or tribunal may be reported to this state subject to this chapter.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1257, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 523.005. EFFECT OF CONVICTION. (a) The licensing authority in the home state, for the purpose of suspension, revocation, cancellation, denial, disqualification, or limitation of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle, shall give the same effect to the conduct reported pursuant to Section 523.004 as it would if such conduct had occurred in the home state in the case of conviction for:

(1) manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle;

(2) driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic beverages or a narcotic to a degree which renders the driver incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;

(3) any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used; or

(4) failure to stop and render aid or information in the event of a motor vehicle collision resulting in the death or personal injury of another.

(b) As to other convictions reported pursuant to this compact, the licensing authority in the home state shall give such effect to the conduct as is provided by the laws of the home state.

(c) If the laws of a state do not provide for offenses or violations denominated or described in precisely the words employed in Subsection (a), those offenses or violations of a substantially similar nature and the laws of that state shall be understood to contain such provisions as may be necessary to ensure that full force and effect is given to this compact.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 523.006. APPLICATIONS FOR NEW LICENSES. On receiving an application for a license to drive, the licensing authority in a state shall ascertain whether the applicant has ever held or is the holder of a license to drive issued by any other state. The licensing authority in the state where application is made shall not issue a license to the applicant if the applicant:

(1) has held a license but the license has been suspended by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation and the suspension period has not terminated;

(2) has held a license but the license has been revoked by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation and the revocation has not terminated, except that after the expiration of one year from the date the license was revoked the person may apply for a new license if permitted by law; the licensing authority may refuse to issue a license to any such applicant if, after investigation, the licensing authority determines that it will not be safe to grant the person the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways; or

(3) is the holder of a license issued by another state currently in force unless the applicant surrenders such license or provides an affidavit prescribed by the licensing authority that such license is no longer in the person's possession.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.007. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAWS. Except as expressly required by provisions of this compact, nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the right of any state to apply any of its other laws relating to licenses to drive to any person or circumstance nor to invalidate or prevent any driver's license agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.008. COMPACT ADMINISTRATOR AND INTERCHANGE OF INFORMATION AND COMPENSATION OF EXPENSES. (a) The compact administrator shall be appointed by the executive director of the licensing authority. A compact administrator may provide for the discharge of his duties and the performance of his position by an alternate. The administrators, acting jointly, shall have the power to formulate all necessary and proper procedures for the exchange of information under this compact.

(b) The administrator of each state shall furnish to the administrator of each other state any information or documents reasonably necessary to facilitate the administration of this compact.

(c) The compact administrator provided for in this compact shall not be entitled to any additional compensation on account of his service as such administrator but shall be entitled to expenses incurred in connection with his duties and responsibilities as such administrator in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with any other duties or responsibilities of his office or employment.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.009. EFFECTIVE DATE; WITHDRAWAL FROM COMPACT. (a) This compact shall enter into force and become effective as to any state when it has enacted the compact into law.

(b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the compact, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until six months after the executive director of the withdrawing state has given notice of the withdrawal to the executive directors of all other member states. No withdrawal shall affect the validity or applicability by the licensing authorities of states remaining party to the compact of any report of conviction occurring prior to the withdrawal.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.010. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The licensing authority may adopt any rules and regulations deemed necessary by the executive director to administer and enforce the provisions of this compact.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 523.011. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY. This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable; if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect in the remaining states and in full force and effect in the state affected with regard to all severable matters.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.